Hawaii statutes.
[§551E-3] Power of attorney. (a) A
power of attorney created under this chapter shall be durable unless it
expressly provides that it is terminated by the incapacity of the principal.

(b) A power of attorney shall be signed by the
principal or in the principal's conscious presence by another individual
directed by the principal to sign the principal's name on the power of
attorney. A signature on a power of attorney is presumed to be genuine if the
principal acknowledges the signature before a notary public or other individual
authorized by law to take acknowledgments.

(c) A power of attorney executed in Hawaii on
or after January 1, 2015, is valid if its execution complied with the law of
this State as it existed at the time of execution.

(d) A power of attorney executed outside of
Hawaii is valid in this State if, when the power of attorney was executed, the
execution complied with:

(1) The law of the jurisdiction that determines the
meaning and effect of the power of attorney pursuant to subsection (f); or

(2) The requirements for a military power of attorney
pursuant to title 10 United States Code section 1044b, as amended.

(e) Except as otherwise provided by statute
other than this chapter, a photocopy or electronically transmitted copy of an
original power of attorney shall have the same effect as the original.

(f) The meaning and effect of a power of
attorney is determined by the law of the jurisdiction indicated in the power of
attorney and, in the absence of an indication of jurisdiction, by the law of
the jurisdiction in which the power of attorney was executed. [L 2014, c 22, pt
of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next